Hawaii statutes.
§560:3-1215 Prohibition on the
private practice of law by attorneys for small estates. No person who,
pursuant to sections 560:3-1205 to 560:3-1214, or any of them, performs any
services as or for the clerk of the first circuit court, for which the person
is compensated from public funds, shall engage in the private practice of law,
provided that the person shall be entitled to accept fees or other compensation
in connection with masterships. [L 1996, c 288, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next